Idaho, session 2025, H0340.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 44-1802, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
44-1802. COLLECTIVE BARGAINING RIGHTS OF FIREFIGHTERS -- REPRESENTA-
TION BY BARGAINING AGENT. The firefighters in any city, county, fire dis-
trict or other political subdivision in the state of Idaho shall have the
right to bargain collectively with their respective cities, counties, fire
districts or political subdivisions and to be represented by a bargaining
agent in such collective bargaining process as to wages, and rates of pay,
working conditions and all other terms and conditions of employment.
SECTION 2. APPLICABILITY. The provisions of this act shall apply to all
contracts entered into or amended after July 1, 2025, and shall apply to any
renewal or extension of any existing contract on or after that date.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.